Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2368.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Human Trafficking Screening and Intervention Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Health care facility." An emergency department of a licensed hospital, an urgent care center or a community health care center."Human trafficking." As defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001 (relating to definitions).12345678910111213141516171819 "Protocols." The standardized protocol established under section 3."Trauma-informed care." A health care framework that involves understanding, recognizing and responding to the effects of all types of trauma.Section 3. Standardized protocols.(a) Establishment.--Within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall develop and publish standardized human trafficking screening and intervention protocols for use by health care facilities.(b) Contents.--The protocols shall include:(1) Use of evidence-based, trauma-informed care screening questions.(2) Requirements for health care providers to interview patients alone in a secure environment if human trafficking is suspected.(3) A standardized procedure to refer patients to community-based victim service providers and legal resources.(4) Immediate steps for patient safety if the patient chooses not to involve law enforcement.Section 4. Training requirements.(a) Mandatory training.--A health care facility shall ensure that all clinical and patient-facing staff complete an initial training program on the protocols within 90 days of hire.(b) Continuing education.--Staff under subsection (a) shall complete a continuing education course on the protocols every two years.(c) Development.--The department shall develop the training and continuing education programs required under this section.Section 5. Enforcement and reporting.20260HB2368PN3155 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Compliance.--The department shall verify compliance with this act during routine inspections of health care facilities.(b) Data collection.--(1) A health care facility shall annually report de-identified data to the department on the number of screenings performed and number of referrals made relating to human trafficking.(2) The department shall annually submit a report to the General Assembly containing the data received under paragraph (1).Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2368PN3155 - 3 - 123456789101112